src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/A-sloohman_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Adjective - sloohman e-stem pöly: # Adjective "hearsome/tottelevainen" - full paradigm
     sloohman+A+Sg+Nom: sloohman
     sloohman+A+Sg+Gen: sloohman
     sloohman+A+Sg+Acc: sloohman
     sloohman+A+Sg+Ill: sloohmna
     sloohman+A+Sg+Loc: sloohmnest
     sloohman+A+Sg+Com: sloohmnin
     sloohman+A+Ess: sloohmnen
     sloohman+A+Par: sloohmned
     sloohman+A+Sg+Abe: [sloohmantaa, sloohmantää]
     sloohman+A+Pl+Nom: sloohman
     sloohman+A+Pl+Gen: sloohmni
     sloohman+A+Pl+Acc: sloohmnid
     sloohman+A+Pl+Ill: sloohmnid
     sloohman+A+Pl+Loc: sloohmnin
     sloohman+A+Pl+Com: sloohmnivuiʹm
     sloohman+A+Pl+Abe: [sloohmnitaa, sloohmnitää]
